Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201646-179
Exclusion of lands; objection made; action of board; election required; notice; procedure.

If the assent of the holders of the bonds is filed and entered of record as provided in section 46-178, and if there are objections presented by any person showing cause which have not been withdrawn, then the board of directors may order an election to be held in the irrigation district to determine whether an order shall be made excluding such lands from the district as mentioned in the resolution. The notice of such election shall describe the boundaries of all the lands which it is proposed to exclude, and such notice shall be published for at least two weeks prior to such election in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the office of the board of directors is situated; and if any portion of such territory to be excluded lies within another county or counties, then such notice shall be so published in a newspaper of general circulation in each of such counties. Such notice shall require the electors to cast ballots which shall contain the words For exclusion, or Against exclusion, or words equivalent thereto. Such election shall otherwise be conducted in accordance with sections 46-115 to 46-118.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 52, p. 299;

R.S.1913, § 3509;

C.S.1922, § 2909;

C.S.1929, § 46-154;

R.S.1943, § 46-179;

Laws 2015, LB561, § 10.

For election laws, see Chapter 32.